Mississippi, session 2026, HB1332.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 83-17-59, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 83-17-59.  (1)  A resident individual applying for an insurance producer license shall pass a written examination unless exempt under Section 83-17-67 or Section 83-17-39.  The examination shall test the knowledge of the individual concerning the lines of authority for which application is made, the duties and responsibilities of an insurance producer and the insurance laws and regulations of this state. Examinations required by this section shall be developed and conducted under rules and regulations prescribed by the commissioner. (2)  The commissioner may make arrangements, including contracting with an outside testing service, for administering examinations and collecting a nonrefundable examination fee.  A testing service under contract to administer examination services, as authorized under this subsection, must develop, administer and score the examinations in accordance with the standards and best practices developed and set forth by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners. (3)  Each individual applying for an examination shall remit a nonrefundable fee as prescribed by the commissioner. (4)  An individual who fails to appear for the examination as scheduled or fails to pass the examination shall reapply for an examination and remit all required fees and forms before being rescheduled for another examination. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.